Washington statutes.
RCW 43.61.040

Director of veterans affairs to make rules and regulations—Veteran services—Annual report.

The director of veterans affairs shall make such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The department shall furnish information, advice, and assistance to veterans and coordinate all programs and services in the field of veterans' claims service, education, health, vocational guidance and placement, and services not provided by some other agency of the state or by the federal government. The director shall submit a report of the departments' activities hereunder each year to the governor.

[ 1977 c 75 s 60; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 115 s 22; 1971 ex.s. c 189 s 6; 1970 ex.s. c 18 s 34; 1965 c 8 s 43.61.040. Prior: 1947 c 110 s 3; RRS s 10758-102.]

NOTES:

Construction—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 115: See RCW 43.60A.907.

Effective date—Severability—1970 ex.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 43.20A.010.